Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202560-636
Minibike, defined.

(1) Minibike shall mean a two-wheel motor vehicle that:

(a) Has a total wheel and tire diameter of less than fourteen inches;

(b) Has an engine-rated capacity of less than forty-five cubic centimeters displacement;

(c) Has an engine power output of less than three horsepower;

(d) Has an engine-rated capacity of less than two thousand two hundred thirty-eight watts; or

(e) Was primarily designed by the manufacturer for off-road use only.

(2) Minibike shall not include an electric personal assistive mobility device.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 132;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 450;

Laws 2025, LB97, § 39.